Illinois, session 104th, SB132.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Plastic Bottle Cap Reduction Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 7context requires otherwise:8    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency.9    "Beverage" means any of the following products that are in 10liquid, ready-to-drink form, are in plastic beverage 11containers of 16 ounces or less, and are intended for human 12consumption: beer and malt beverages; wine, wine coolers, or 13distilled spirits coolers; carbonated and noncarbonated water; 14soda; carbonated and noncarbonated soft drinks and fruit 15drinks; coffee and tea drinks; and vegetable juice. 16    "Manufacturer" means a person, partnership, association, 17corporation, or other entity that, through its own action or 18through contract or control of another entity, is primarily 19responsible for the production of a beverage held in a 20single-use plastic beverage container and sold, offered for 21sale, or distributed for sale in the State.22    "Plastic" means a synthetic material made from fossil fuel 23or organic-based polymers that can be molded or blown into   SB0132- 2 -LRB104 03159 BDA 13180 b1specific shapes. "Plastic" includes polyethylene, polystyrene, 2polypropylene, and polycarbonate.3    "Plastic beverage cap" means a cap that is composed wholly 4or primarily of plastic and that is screwed onto or otherwise 5affixed to a single-use plastic beverage container. "Plastic 6beverage cap" does not include a cap that is composed wholly or 7primarily of a nonplastic material but also contains a plastic 8seal.9    "Single-use plastic beverage container" means an 10individual bottle, can, jar, carton, or other container that:11    (1) is composed wholly or primarily of plastic;12    (2) contains one liter or less of a beverage; and13    (3) is intended to be disposed of after one use.14    "Single-use plastic beverage container" does not include a 15bottle, jar, carton, or container that is composed wholly or 16primarily of nonplastic materials but also contains a plastic 17beverage cap; a cup or other similar open or loosely sealed 18container; or a container that is intended by the producer to 19be reused for the same purpose multiple times. 20    Section 10. Plastic beverage caps. Beginning January 1, 212029, a manufacturer may not sell, offer for sale, or 22distribute for sale in the State a single-use plastic beverage 23container with a plastic beverage cap unless the plastic 24beverage cap is composed of a plastic resin with the same resin 25identification code as the single-use plastic beverage   SB0132- 3 -LRB104 03159 BDA 13180 b1container as determined in accordance with the Standard 2Practice for Coding Plastic Manufactured Articles for Resin 3Identification of the American Society for Testing and 4Materials, ASTM D7611, and:5    (1) the plastic beverage cap is tethered to the single-use 6plastic beverage container in a manner that prevents the 7separation of the plastic beverage cap from the single-use 8plastic beverage container when the plastic beverage cap is 9removed; or10    (2) the plastic beverage cap includes an opening from 11which the beverage can be consumed while the plastic beverage 12cap remains screwed onto or otherwise affixed to the 13single-use plastic beverage container. 14    Section 15. Manufacturer compliance.15    (a) A manufacturer that produces single-use plastic 16beverage containers shall provide to the Agency upon request 17all information necessary for the Agency to determine the 18manufacturer's compliance with the requirements of this Act.19    (b) In determining whether an entity meets the definition 20of "manufacturer" under Section 5, the Agency shall consider, 21without limitation, the following factors:22        (1) the ownership of the brand name of the beverage 23    contained in the single-use plastic beverage container;24        (2) the primary control or influence over the design 25    of the beverage contained in the single-use plastic   SB0132- 4 -LRB104 03159 BDA 13180 b1    beverage container; and2        (3) the primary control or influence over the design 3    of the single-use plastic beverage container in which the 4    beverage is contained.5    (c) An entity with a legally recognized corporate 6relationship to a manufacturer that is subject to the 7requirements of this Section may, on behalf of that 8manufacturer and following notification to the Agency, assume 9the manufacturer's responsibilities under this Act.10    (d) The requirements of this Act do not apply to a 11manufacturer of beer, wine, or spirits that annually produces 1250,000 gallons or less of any one or more of those products or 13to a manufacturer of beverages other than beer, wine, or 14spirits that annually produces 250,000 or fewer single-use 15plastic beverage containers containing its product. 16    Section 20. Enforcement and penalties.17    (a) Any person who violates any provision of this Act 18shall be liable for a civil penalty of $1,000 per violation per 19day.20    (b) The Attorney General or the State's Attorney of the 21county where the violation occurs may enforce this Act by 22bringing an action for civil penalties for violation of this 23Act, for equitable relief to prevent violation of this Act, or 24for a combination of civil penalties and equitable relief 25under this Act.